extensions/2696307_словарь-орфографии-вики/2696307-1.103/dictionaries/ru_RU.aff
FLAG num
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 0 ников .
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 0 ником .
SFX 1538 Y 1
SFX 1538 0 альные .
SFX 1139 Y 1
SFX 1139 0 альный .
SFX 1537 Y 1
SFX 1537 0 альным .
SFX 2667 Y 1
SFX 2667 0 ёшься .
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 0 ваешь .
SFX 2980 Y 1
SFX 2980 0 ваты .
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 0 вать .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 тельница .
SFX 2407 Y 1
SFX 2407 0 тельнице .
SFX 2616 Y 1
SFX 2616 0 зов .
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 0 зом .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 хся .
SFX 1391 Y 1
SFX 1391 0 нова .
SFX 1451 Y 1
SFX 1451 0 нове .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 щих .
SFX 1528 Y 1
SFX 1528 0 щиц .
SFX 2607 Y 1
SFX 2607 0 ющееся .
SFX 2698 Y 1
SFX 2698 0 вкою .
SFX 2164 Y 1
SFX 2164 0 чное .
SFX 2169 Y 1
SFX 2169 0 чной .
SFX 2163 Y 1
SFX 2163 0 чном .
SFX 2223 Y 1
SFX 2223 0 льницам .
SFX 1527 Y 1
SFX 1527 0 щицам .
SFX 1095 Y 1
SFX 1095 0 ающую .
SFX 782 Y 1
SFX 782 0 иными .
SFX 849 Y 1
SFX 849 0 вшимися .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 а .
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 0 б .
SFX 59 Y 1
SFX 59 0 в .
SFX 1317 Y 1
SFX 1317 0 г .
SFX 1161 Y 1
SFX 1161 0 д .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 е .
SFX 2256 Y 1
SFX 2256 0 ж .
SFX 1230 Y 1
SFX 1230 0 з .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 и .
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 0 й .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 0 к .
SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 0 л .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 м .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 н .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 о .
SFX 2531 Y 1
SFX 2531 0 п .
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 0 шками .
SFX 2480 Y 1
SFX 2480 0 ищем .
SFX 882 Y 1
SFX 882 0 изму .
SFX 920 Y 1
SFX 920 0 измы .
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 ического .
SFX 2450 Y 1
SFX 2450 0 кав .
SFX 2330 Y 1
SFX 2330 0 кай .
SFX 2329 Y 1
SFX 2329 0 кал .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 кам .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 овою .
SFX 1091 Y 1
SFX 1091 0 лу .
SFX 1108 Y 1
SFX 1108 0 лы .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 ль .
SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420 0 лю .
SFX 744 Y 1
SFX 744 0 ля .
SFX 514 Y 1
SFX 514 0 рах .
SFX 904 Y 1
SFX 904 0 ьные .
SFX 647 Y 1
SFX 647 0 ьный .
SFX 903 Y 1
SFX 903 0 ьным .
SFX 1240 Y 1
SFX 1240 0 кову .
SFX 1181 Y 1
SFX 1181 0 ковы .
SFX 2977 Y 1
SFX 2977 0 рованием .
SFX 2151 Y 1
SFX 2151 0 тках .
SFX 2602 Y 1
SFX 2602 0 ющиеся .
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 0 вшуюся .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 анием .
SFX 1842 Y 1
SFX 1842 0 цею .
SFX 1841 Y 1
SFX 1841 0 ицу .
SFX 1864 Y 1
SFX 1864 0 ицы .
SFX 2094 Y 1
SFX 2094 0 ичного .
SFX 2064 Y 1
SFX 2064 0 евшему .
SFX 2891 Y 1
SFX 2891 0 енькой .
SFX 1121 Y 1
SFX 1121 0 ировалась .
SFX 2278 Y 1
SFX 2278 0 кала .
SFX 2418 Y 1
SFX 2418 0 кали .
SFX 2542 Y 1
SFX 2542 0 кало .
SFX 1281 Y 1
SFX 1281 0 кину .
SFX 1294 Y 1
SFX 1294 0 кины .
SFX 2217 Y 1
SFX 2217 0 льницу .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 0 льницы .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 0 иков .
SFX 1382 Y 1
SFX 1382 0 икой .
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 иком .
SFX 1657 Y 1
SFX 1657 0 уйся .
SFX 2927 Y 1
SFX 2927 0 ватая .
SFX 2086 Y 1
SFX 2086 0 анному .
SFX 491 Y 1
SFX 491 0 ниям .
SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 0 очку .
SFX 714 Y 1
SFX 714 0 щику .
SFX 1719 Y 1
SFX 1719 0 нина .
SFX 1795 Y 1
SFX 1795 0 нине .
SFX 1666 Y 1
SFX 1666 0 ованиями .
SFX 2864 Y 1
SFX 2864 0 руемся .
SFX 2960 Y 1
SFX 2960 0 нгу .
SFX 1535 Y 1
SFX 1535 0 альных .
SFX 1332 Y 1
SFX 1332 0 ичами .
SFX 963 Y 1
SFX 963 0 нными .
SFX 2227 Y 1
SFX 2227 0 яйте .
SFX 2648 Y 1
SFX 2648 0 олога .
SFX 2644 Y 1
SFX 2644 0 ологе .
SFX 2654 Y 1
SFX 2654 0 ологи .
SFX 2404 Y 1
SFX 2404 0 тельницу .
SFX 2403 Y 1
SFX 2403 0 тельницы .
SFX 2241 Y 1
SFX 2241 0 рному .
SFX 1437 Y 1
SFX 1437 0 нову .
SFX 1399 Y 1
SFX 1399 0 новы .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 вшего .
SFX 726 Y 1
SFX 726 0 инам .
SFX 1865 Y 1
SFX 1865 0 атов .
SFX 1444 Y 1
SFX 1444 0 атом .
SFX 1255 Y 1
SFX 1255 0 аньями .
SFX 2431 Y 1
SFX 2431 0 нского .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 шкам .
SFX 2173 Y 1
SFX 2173 0 чною .
SFX 2221 Y 1
SFX 2221 0 льницах .
SFX 1525 Y 1
SFX 1525 0 щицах .
SFX 1040 Y 1
SFX 1040 0 ческое .
SFX 1039 Y 1
SFX 1039 0 ческой .
SFX 1032 Y 1
SFX 1032 0 ческом .
SFX 2926 Y 1
SFX 2926 0 ватого .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 0 киным .
SFX 1269 Y 1
SFX 1269 0 ением .
SFX 361 Y 1
SFX 361 0 р .
SFX 646 Y 1
SFX 646 0 с .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 0 т .
SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 0 у .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 х .
SFX 552 Y 1
SFX 552 0 ц .
SFX 1295 Y 1
SFX 1295 0 ч .
SFX 771 Y 1
SFX 771 0 ш .
SFX 2030 Y 1
SFX 2030 0 щ .
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 ы .
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 0 ь .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 ю .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 я .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 0 оров .
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 0 ором .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 ье .
SFX 2318 Y 1
SFX 2318 0 ьи .
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 шаяся .
SFX 1083 Y 1
SFX 1083 0 нула .
SFX 1082 Y 1
SFX 1082 0 нули .
SFX 1089 Y 1
SFX 1089 0 нуло .
SFX 1194 Y 1
SFX 1194 0 ющие .
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 0 ющий .
SFX 1193 Y 1
SFX 1193 0 ющим .
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 0 ка .
SFX 117 Y 1
SFX 117 0 ке .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 0 ки .
SFX 1710 Y 1
SFX 1710 0 ко .
SFX 2388 Y 1
SFX 2388 0 ельницей .
SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 0 шую .
SFX 1003 Y 1
SFX 1003 0 сами .
SFX 2265 Y 1
SFX 2265 0 авшеюся .
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 0 ках .
SFX 2664 Y 1
SFX 2664 0 каю .
SFX 1568 Y 1
SFX 1568 0 кая .
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 0 ьных .
SFX 1625 Y 1
SFX 1625 0 ывались .
SFX 1877 Y 1
SFX 1877 0 ровать .
SFX 2288 Y 1
SFX 2288 0 ающейся .
SFX 2103 Y 1
SFX 2103 0 ушкам .
SFX 2869 Y 1
SFX 2869 0 ровалось .
SFX 349 Y 1
SFX 349 0 шееся .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 алось .
SFX 2663 Y 1
SFX 2663 0 кими .
SFX 2890 Y 1
SFX 2890 0 енькою .
SFX 1106 Y 1
SFX 1106 0 ающая .
SFX 2647 Y 1
SFX 2647 0 ологам .
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 0 уешь .
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 0 ями .
SFX 594 Y 1
SFX 594 0 ующий .
SFX 1383 Y 1
SFX 1383 0 икою .
SFX 489 Y 1
SFX 489 0 ниях .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 ничающий .
SFX 1760 Y 1
SFX 1760 0 нину .
SFX 2054 Y 1
SFX 2054 0 нины .
SFX 2182 Y 1
SFX 2182 0 лкой .
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 0 илась .
SFX 2023 Y 1
SFX 2023 0 хой .
SFX 2642 Y 1
SFX 2642 0 ологу .
SFX 758 Y 1
SFX 758 0 ируем .
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 0 овала .
SFX 596 Y 1
SFX 596 0 овали .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 овало .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 идный .
SFX 2303 Y 1
SFX 2303 0 явшие .
SFX 1826 Y 1
SFX 1826 0 явший .
SFX 2302 Y 1
SFX 2302 0 явшим .
SFX 2406 Y 1
SFX 2406 0 тельницей .
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 ностям .
SFX 1483 Y 1
SFX 1483 0 овскому .
SFX 1012 Y 1
SFX 1012 0 нувшими .
SFX 741 Y 1
SFX 741 0 инах .
SFX 2995 Y 1
SFX 2995 0 атор .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 шках .
SFX 346 Y 1
SFX 346 0 шиеся .
SFX 1026 Y 1
SFX 1026 0 чка .
SFX 1092 Y 1
SFX 1092 0 чке .
SFX 1080 Y 1
SFX 1080 0 чки .
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 0 льное .
SFX 763 Y 1
SFX 763 0 льной .
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 0 льном .
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 0 ившимися .
SFX 1037 Y 1
SFX 1037 0 ческою .
SFX 2189 Y 1
SFX 2189 0 ологией .
SFX 1302 Y 1
SFX 1302 0 киных .
SFX 2170 Y 1
SFX 2170 0 ушек .
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 0 истому .
SFX 1352 Y 1
SFX 1352 0 очные .
SFX 941 Y 1
SFX 941 0 очный .
SFX 1351 Y 1
SFX 1351 0 очным .
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77 0 ными .
SFX 116 Y 1
SFX 116 0 стей .
SFX 1005 Y 1
SFX 1005 0 шам .
SFX 1270 Y 1
SFX 1270 0 вое .
SFX 545 Y 1
SFX 545 0 вой .
SFX 2574 Y 1
SFX 2574 0 вок .
SFX 998 Y 1
SFX 998 0 вом .
SFX 443 Y 1
SFX 443 0 ью .
SFX 562 Y 1
SFX 562 0 ья .
SFX 1636 Y 1
SFX 1636 0 ивающийся .
SFX 2805 Y 1
SFX 2805 0 емые .
SFX 456 Y 1
SFX 456 0 емый .
SFX 2804 Y 1
SFX 2804 0 емым .
SFX 1191 Y 1
SFX 1191 0 ющих .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 0 ку .
SFX 2387 Y 1
SFX 2387 0 ельницею .
SFX 1495 Y 1
SFX 1495 0 тельна .
SFX 1392 Y 1
SFX 1392 0 тельно .
SFX 1695 Y 1
SFX 1695 0 ывавшего .
SFX 2902 Y 1
SFX 2902 0 изируйтесь .
SFX 2039 Y 1
SFX 2039 0 изирующий .
SFX 2101 Y 1
SFX 2101 0 ушках .
SFX 1720 Y 1
SFX 1720 0 ивавшую .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 ающийся .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 овыми .
SFX 2378 Y 1
SFX 2378 0 ившеюся .
SFX 2957 Y 1
SFX 2957 0 нностью .
SFX 2231 Y 1
SFX 2231 0 яют .
SFX 1554 Y 1
SFX 1554 0 онам .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 0 ета .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 ете .
SFX 2645 Y 1
SFX 2645 0 ологах .
SFX 2576 Y 1
SFX 2576 0 вками .
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 0 итесь .
SFX 467 Y 1
SFX 467 0 вавшие .
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 0 вавший .
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 0 вавшим .
SFX 2010 Y 1
SFX 2010 0 изировала .
SFX 2009 Y 1
SFX 2009 0 изировали .
SFX 2008 Y 1
SFX 2008 0 изировало .
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 0 вшихся .
SFX 2181 Y 1
SFX 2181 0 лкою .
SFX 2943 Y 1
SFX 2943 0 изирующийся .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 0 авшее .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 0 авшей .
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 0 авшем .
SFX 2491 Y 1
SFX 2491 0 ированные .
SFX 1133 Y 1
SFX 1133 0 ированный .
SFX 2490 Y 1
SFX 2490 0 ированным .
SFX 670 Y 1
SFX 670 0 лей .
SFX 973 Y 1
SFX 973 0 лем .
SFX 653 Y 1
SFX 653 0 лен .
SFX 2074 Y 1
SFX 2074 0 хою .
SFX 1757 Y 1
SFX 1757 0 ничаете .
SFX 2150 Y 1
SFX 2150 0 чами .
SFX 2855 Y 1
SFX 2855 0 тикам .
SFX 949 Y 1
SFX 949 0 ированиями .
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 0 ирует .
SFX 2707 Y 1
SFX 2707 0 торам .
SFX 2300 Y 1
SFX 2300 0 явших .
SFX 1262 Y 1
SFX 1262 0 ствовала .
SFX 1261 Y 1
SFX 1261 0 ствовали .
SFX 1260 Y 1
SFX 1260 0 ствовало .
SFX 2405 Y 1
SFX 2405 0 тельницею .
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 ностях .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 0 авшись .
SFX 1043 Y 1
SFX 1043 0 ческими .
SFX 1090 Y 1
SFX 1090 0 чку .
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 0 льною .
SFX 1920 Y 1
SFX 1920 0 аемую .
SFX 2188 Y 1
SFX 2188 0 ологиею .
SFX 1339 Y 1
SFX 1339 0 ываем .
SFX 1107 Y 1
SFX 1107 0 уемый .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 ые .
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 0 ый .
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 ым .
SFX 1279 Y 1
SFX 1279 0 ствующий .
SFX 1349 Y 1
SFX 1349 0 очных .
SFX 2624 Y 1
SFX 2624 0 тную .
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 0 шах .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 шая .
SFX 1062 Y 1
SFX 1062 0 вою .
SFX 2197 Y 1
SFX 2197 0 ологиями .
SFX 2802 Y 1
SFX 2802 0 емых .
SFX 1494 Y 1
SFX 1494 0 тельны .
SFX 829 Y 1
SFX 829 0 имый .
SFX 2865 Y 1
SFX 2865 0 рскому .
SFX 2067 Y 1
SFX 2067 0 евшее .
SFX 2066 Y 1
SFX 2066 0 евшей .
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 0 евшем .
SFX 535 Y 1
SFX 535 0 вавшись .
SFX 1889 Y 1
SFX 1889 0 руем .
SFX 1680 Y 1
SFX 1680 0 нутся .
SFX 1120 Y 1
SFX 1120 0 ировались .
SFX 710 Y 1
SFX 710 0 чикам .
SFX 2435 Y 1
SFX 2435 0 нские .
SFX 1931 Y 1
SFX 1931 0 нский .
SFX 2434 Y 1
SFX 2434 0 нским .
SFX 1802 Y 1
SFX 1802 0 яла .
SFX 1787 Y 1
SFX 1787 0 яли .
SFX 1825 Y 1
SFX 1825 0 яло .
SFX 652 Y 1
SFX 652 0 нув .
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 0 нул .
SFX 1551 Y 1
SFX 1551 0 онах .
SFX 2979 Y 1
SFX 2979 0 ету .
SFX 1404 Y 1
SFX 1404 0 еть .
SFX 464 Y 1
SFX 464 0 вавших .
SFX 625 Y 1
SFX 625 0 ваясь .
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 0 авшею .
SFX 2719 Y 1
SFX 2719 0 яйся .
SFX 2488 Y 1
SFX 2488 0 ированных .
SFX 1777 Y 1
SFX 1777 0 лите .
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 0 ницам .
SFX 1014 Y 1
SFX 1014 0 нувшие .
SFX 686 Y 1
SFX 686 0 нувший .
SFX 1013 Y 1
SFX 1013 0 нувшим .
SFX 2853 Y 1
SFX 2853 0 тиках .
SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140 0 лась .
SFX 2095 Y 1
SFX 2095 0 изируемый .
SFX 1659 Y 1
SFX 1659 0 нёте .
SFX 2692 Y 1
SFX 2692 0 торах .
SFX 2807 Y 1
SFX 2807 0 емого .
SFX 1994 Y 1
SFX 1994 0 льности .
SFX 1610 Y 1
SFX 1610 0 аемте .
SFX 1200 Y 1
SFX 1200 0 ющего .
SFX 1338 Y 1
SFX 1338 0 ывает .
SFX 547 Y 1
SFX 547 0 ров .
SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 0 рой .
SFX 2726 Y 1
SFX 2726 0 рок .
SFX 606 Y 1
SFX 606 0 ром .
SFX 2157 Y 1
SFX 2157 0 оза .
SFX 2190 Y 1
SFX 2190 0 озе .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 ых .
SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25 0 тесь .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 ываете .
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 0 ичными .
SFX 1637 Y 1
SFX 1637 0 иваются .
SFX 2846 Y 1
SFX 2846 0 ткой .
SFX 2498 Y 1
SFX 2498 0 ированного .
SFX 635 Y 1
SFX 635 0 имтесь .
SFX 1178 Y 1
SFX 1178 0 телей .
SFX 1203 Y 1
SFX 1203 0 телем .
SFX 1501 Y 1
SFX 1501 0 телен .
SFX 1870 Y 1
SFX 1870 0 тка .
SFX 2295 Y 1
SFX 2295 0 тке .
SFX 2075 Y 1
SFX 2075 0 тки .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 чевой .
SFX 1300 Y 1
SFX 1300 0 ата .
SFX 1843 Y 1
SFX 1843 0 ате .
SFX 415 Y 1
SFX 415 0 ическими .
SFX 2063 Y 1
SFX 2063 0 евшею .
SFX 1988 Y 1
SFX 1988 0 овичам .
SFX 1731 Y 1
SFX 1731 0 ивавшая .
SFX 1888 Y 1
SFX 1888 0 рует .
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 0 ниной .
SFX 2263 Y 1
SFX 2263 0 авшимися .
SFX 2925 Y 1
SFX 2925 0 ватое .
SFX 2843 Y 1
SFX 2843 0 ватой .
SFX 2758 Y 1
SFX 2758 0 ватом .
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 0 чиках .
SFX 2432 Y 1
SFX 2432 0 нских .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 авшему .
SFX 636 Y 1
SFX 636 0 нут .
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 0 ную .
SFX 1429 Y 1
SFX 1429 0 ельного .
SFX 1051 Y 1
SFX 1051 0 овавшие .
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 овавший .
SFX 1050 Y 1
SFX 1050 0 овавшим .
SFX 1371 Y 1
SFX 1371 0 очному .
SFX 2604 Y 1
SFX 2604 0 ющемуся .
SFX 1851 Y 1
SFX 1851 0 ицам .
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 0 щее .
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 0 щей .
